src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
! ============ !
! Proper nouns !
! ============ !

! Table of content
! ================
! - Splitting into name types
! - The name lexica
! - mal
! - fem
! - plc
! - sur 

! Splitting into name types
! =========================

! When the dust has settled, these 5 types will be joined into one 
! alphabetical list. They are separated in this initial phase in order
! to make uniform treatment of each type easier.

! TODO: getting a ton of names using an english bible names dictionary, stemming it, and running it against the outputted map3 alignment file
! cat /Users/pyry/gtsvn_priv/plan/assignments/Ryan/som/corp/bible/bible.names.porterstemming | tr '[A-Z]' '[a-z]' | awk {'print "Grep \" "$1"$\" map3_subsentence_out_stripletter_reorg"'} | bash > bible.someng.names.txt



LEXICON ProperNouns
names ; 
places ;
places_masc ;
guess_prop ; ! Testing a guesser component
guess_acro ;

! The name lexica
! ===============

! TODO: how to exclude things like these if there is another analysis? 
LEXICON guess_prop
< [A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z|Æ|Ø|Å|Ä|Ö|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|Ý|Ü]
[a|b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|q|r|s|t|u|v|w|x|y|z|æ|ø|å|ä|ö|á|é|í|ó|ú|ý|ü]*
%+N:0 %+Prop:0 %+Sg:0 > guesstag ; 

LEXICON guess_acro
< [A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|W|X|Y|Z|Æ|Ø|Å|Ä|Ö|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|Ý|Ü]*
%+N:0 %+Prop:0 %+Acr:0 %+Sg:0 > guesstag ; 

LEXICON guesstag

+Nom+Guess: # ;
+Abs+Guess: # ;
+Gen+Guess: # ;

! For finding uncovered nouns with noun morphology
! +N+Guess: NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
! +N+Guess: NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;

! There are a few completely unambiguous suffixes. Those we can probably guess?


! Faroese place names

LEXICON places
! Mostly biblical for now
Suuriya placetag "Syria" ;
Xamar placetag "Mogadishu" ;
Aasheer placetag "Asher" ;
Ashqeloonna placetag "Askelon" ;
Baabuloon placetag "Babylon" ;
Camaaleq placetag "Amalekite" ; ! TODO: also refers to people
Cammoon placetag "Ammon" ;
Efrayim:Efrayi%{mm%} placetag "Ephraim" ;
Falastiin placetag "Philistine" ;
Gad placetag "Gath" ;
Gilbocow placetag "Gilboa" ; ! TODO: might this be a vocative?
Gilecaad placetag "Gilead" ;
Lubnaan placetag "Lebanon" ;
Manaseh placetag "Manasseh" ;
Siiqlag placetag "Ziklag" ;
Gilboca placetag "Gilboa" ;

Soomaaliya placetag ; 
Djibouti placetag ; 
Somali placetag ; 
Muqdisho placetag ; 
Siiqlag placetag "Ziklag" ;
Lubnaan placetag "Lebanon" ; 
Israaiil placetag "Israel" ;
Israa'iil placetag "Israel" ;
Somaliland placetag "Somaliland" ; 
Bangladesh placetag "Bangladesh" ;
Yurub placetag "Europe" ;
Helsinki placetag "Helsinki" ;
Espoo placetag "Espoo" ;
Kauniainen placetag "Kauniainen" ;
Istooniya placetag "Estonia" ;
Iswiidhan placetag "Sweden" ;
Iswedhen placetag "Sweden" ;
Sweden placetag "Sweden" ;
Finland placetag "Finland" ;
Ruush placetag "Russia" ;
Teel placetag "Tel" ; 
Aabiib placetag "Abib" ;

LEXICON places_masc
Korintos PROP_PLACE_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Corinth" ;
Laawi PROP_PLACE_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Levite" ;
Masar PROP_PLACE_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Egypt" ;
Naasared PROP_PLACE_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Nazareth" ;
Naftaali PROP_PLACE_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Naphtali" ;
Sebulun PROP_PLACE_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Zebulun" ;
Siyoon PROP_PLACE_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Zion" ;
Urdun PROP_PLACE_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Jordan" ;
Yeruusaalem:Yeruusaale%{mm%} PROP_PLACE_NOUN1_M/SgOnly "Jerusalem" ;

LEXICON names
biblical_misc ;
Prop_N1F ;
Prop_N1M ;

! Stuff from the ot
Ayneas proptag ;
Taamaar proptag ;
Uuriyaah proptag ;

! Quduus - not prop?

Bildt proptag ;

Lars proptag ;
Zlatan proptag ;
Löfven proptag ;
Rinkeby proptag ;
Sörmland proptag ;
Obama proptag ;
Martin proptag ;

! nouns
!! Ruuxa the spirit
!! Suuriya placetag "Syrian" ; Suuriyihii

! Places 


! TODO: these eventually need to be categorized for gender
! Some automatic categorization possible: done with masc proptag nouns, but should be done with fem, by way of vocative. Probably some have definiteness marked
! cat propernoun-som-lex.txt | grep '^ \w' | grep 'proptag' | tr ':' ' ' | awk {'print $1'} | sed "s/\'/\\\'/g" | xargs -I {} grep "^{}" ../corp/all_words | grep 'ay$'
! TODO: variations need to have one lexical 

LEXICON Prop_N1F
Maryan PROP_NOUN1_F/SgOnly "Mary" ;
Saaray PROP_NOUN1_F/SgOnly "Sarai" ;
Yuhuud PROP_NOUN1_F/SgOnly "Jew" ;

! vim: set ts=4 sw=4 tw=0 syntax=lexc :
